Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103.05
Governing body; prohibit certain contracts.

Notwithstanding sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.03, any governing body may prohibit contracts over a specific dollar amount in which an officer of such body may have an interest.

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 6.